New York, session 2025-2026, A5061.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 2-112 of the 2 election law, as added by chapter 42 of the laws of 2019, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (b) Every county committee shall meet no earlier than [September 5 seventeenth] one day after the June primary is certified and no later 6 than October sixth following the June primary. Until such organization 7 meeting, the existing county committee shall exercise all legal authori- 8 ty. Upon the conclusion of such organization meeting, the new county 9 committee shall assume all legal authority vested in the previously 10 organized county committee. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02336-01-5